Rhode Island, session 2025, SB1051.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Chapter 45-23 of the General Laws entitled "Subdivision of Land" is hereby
amended by adding thereto the following section:
45-23-37.1. Subdivision of oversized lots for residential use.
(a) For the purpose of a land development project involving residential or mixed use, an
applicant may utilize the administrative subdivision process established under § 45-23-37 to request
approval of a proposed subdivision of a lot that is oversized compared to the surrounding
neighborhood. The applicant shall be entitled to subdivide the lot based on the median lot area,
width, depth, and frontage of direct abutters or the median dimensions of all parcels on a contiguous
block, whichever is less for each individual dimension. The applicant may rely on the map of a
local tax assessor to determine these dimensions.
(b) Each city or town shall amend its local regulations to conform to this section by
December 31, 2025.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC002729
========